Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-2406
Mail Service Pharmacy Licensure Act; act, how cited.

Sections 71-2406 to 71-2409 shall be known and may be cited as the Mail Service Pharmacy Licensure Act.

Laws 1988, LB 350, § 1;

Laws 2003, LB 667, § 7.